Utah statutes.
22-7-108.   Unitrust percentages.

The percentage to be used in determining the unitrust amount shall be a reasonable current return from the trust, which may not be less than 3% nor more than 5%, taking into account:

(1)  the intentions of the settlor of the trust as expressed in the governing instrument;

(2)  the needs of the beneficiaries;

(3)  general economic conditions;

(4)  projected current earnings and appreciation for the trust; and

(5)  projected inflation and its impact on the trust.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2013 General Session

